src/scripts/Brazilian-Portuguese/g2p.foma
define BasicUnaccentedParoxytone [Letter - AccentedVowelLetter]* [VowelLetter - AccentedVowelLetter] [Letter - AccentedVowelLetter]* UnstressedEnding ; 
define UnaccentedParoxytoneException [ConsonantLetter* [g|q] [u|ü] UnstressedEnding] | [?* [{ãe}|{ão}|{õe}] (s)] | [{ao} (s)] ; 
define UnaccentedParoxytone BasicUnaccentedParoxytone - UnaccentedParoxytoneException ; 

define TagUnaccentedParoxytone [..] -> PAR || StartOfWord UnaccentedParoxytone _ [Tag - StressTag]* .#. ; 

define MenteSuffix {mente} ; 

define ProparoxytoneBase [?* [
{orica} 
]] ; 

define AddLowerMidTag3 
[..] -> LM5 || StartOfWord ProparoxytoneBase MenteSuffix _ [Tag - LowerMidTag]* .#. ; 

define AddLowerMidTag2 
[..] -> LM4 || StartOfWord [UnaccentedParoxytone - CloseWord] MenteSuffix _ [Tag - LowerMidTag]* .#. ; 

define AddLowerMidTag1 
[..] -> LM3 || StartOfWord [[[[[Letter - AccentedVowelLetter]*] - CloseWord] MenteSuffix] | [{sozinh} [a|o] (s)]] _ [Tag - LowerMidTag]* .#. ; 


define TagFunctionWord 
[..] -> FUNC || StartOfWord FunctionWord _ EndOfWord ; 

define GuQuExceptionsRule 
u -> ü || 
StartOfWord {freq} _ VowelLetterE , 
StartOfWord {seq} _ VowelLetterE {str} , 
{cinq} _ {enta} EndOfWord , 
{tranq} _ {il} , 
StartOfWord {seq} _ {ela} (s) EndOfWord , 
StartOfWord {delinq} _ VowelLetterEOrI , 
StartOfWord {ag} _ {ent} , 
StartOfWord {eq} _ {estre} (s) EndOfWord , 
StartOfWord {antig} _ {idade} (s) EndOfWord , 
StartOfWord {antiq} _ {íssim} [o|a] (s) EndOfWord , 
StartOfWord {ling} _ VowelLetterEOrI , 
StartOfWord  {quinq} _ {ênio} EndOfWord , 
{seq} _ VowelLetterE n ; 

define SHRule 
{sh} -> {ch} ; 

define IntervocalicSRule s -> z || VowelLetter _ VowelLetter ;

define TransRule 
{tr} VowelLetterA n [s:z] -> || StartOfWord _ VowelLetter ; 

define InitialEXVowelRule 
x -> z || 
StartOfWord VowelLetterE _ VowelLetter , 
e _ {ist} ; 

define XAfterDiphthongRule 
x @-> S || [[[VowelLetterA|VowelLetterE] i] | [VowelLetterO u]] _ VowelLetter ,, 
x @-> s || StartOfWord {au} _ ,, 
{trou} [x:s] @-> || StartOfWord _ VowelLetterE ; 

define XBeforeVowelExceptionRule 
x -> ks || 
StartOfWord {ma} _ {imiz} ; 

define RestoreXRule ks -> x ; 

define XBeforeVowelRule 
x -> S || 
m VowelLetterE _ VowelLetter , 
VowelLetterE n _ VowelLetter , 
StartOfWord _ VowelLetter , 
StartOfWord {ta} _ a (s) EndOfWord , 
StartOfWord {ale} _ {andre} EndOfWord , 
{li} _ VowelLetter , 
{co} _ VowelLetter , 
{ve} _ VowelLetter , 
StartOfWord {almo} _ {arifado} (s) EndOfWord , 
StartOfWord {lu} _ VowelLetter , 
{la} _ VowelLetter , 
StartOfWord {ca} _ {ias} EndOfWord , 
StartOfWord {ro} _ VowelLetter , 
StartOfWord {fa} _ {ina} (s) EndOfWord , 
{pu} _ VowelLetter , 
StartOfWord {sobreta} _ a (s) EndOfWord , 
StartOfWord {po} _ a EndOfWord , 
{gra} _ VowelLetter , 
StartOfWord {xi} _ i EndOfWord , 
StartOfWord {bru} _ a ({ria}) EndOfWord ,, 
x -> s || 
StartOfWord m [a|á] _ VowelLetter , 
{pr} [o|ó] _ VowelLetter ; 

define XBeforeConsonantRule 
x -> s || _ ConsonantLetter ; 

define CRule 
{tch} @-> tS ,, 
{ch} @-> S || _ ,, 
[c:s] VowelLetterEOrI @-> || _ ,, 
c @-> k || _ ,, 
ç @-> s || _ ; 

define DoubleSRule 
{ss} @-> s ; 

define YAsIRule 
y -> i || StartOfWord | ConsonantLetter _ EndOfWord | ConsonantLetter ; 

define GRule 
g -> Z || _ VowelLetterEOrI ; 

define UAsWRule 
ü -> w || [g|q] _ VowelLetter ,, 
u -> w || [g|q] _ VowelLetterA | VowelLetterO ,, 
u -> 0 || [g|q] _ VowelLetterEOrI ; 

define QRule 
q -> k ; 

define DefaultRRule 
r -> R ; 

define DoubleRRule 
{RR} @-> R ; 

define RAsTapRule 
R -> r || VowelLetter | FirstConsonantInCluster _ VowelLetter ; 

define JRule 
j -> Z ; 

define YRule 
y -> j ; 

define HRule 
([n:J]|[l:L]) [h:0] @-> ; 

define VowelWithDiacriticRule 
á|â -> a1 || _ ,, 
à -> a || _ ,, 
ã -> aN || _ ,, 
é -> E1 || _ ,, 
ê -> e1 || _ ,, 
í -> i1 || _ ,, 
ó -> O1 || _ ,, 
ô -> o1 || _ ,, 
õ -> oN || _ ,, 
ú -> u1 || _ ,, 
ü -> u || _ ; 

define AAsNasal a:aN|a1:aN1; 
define EAsNasal e:eN|e1:eN1|E1:eN1; 
define IAsNasal i:iN|i1:iN1 ; 
define OAsNasal o:oN|o1:oN1|O1:oN1 ; 
define UAsNasal u:uN|u1:uN1 ; 
define VowelAsNasal AAsNasal| EAsNasal | IAsNasal | OAsNasal | UAsNasal ; 

define NasalDiphthongRule1 
AAsNasal [m:wN] -> || _ EndOfWord ,, 
EAsNasal [m:jN] -> || _ EndOfWord ,, 
EAsNasal [n:jN] -> || _ s EndOfWord ; 

define NasalDiphthongRule2 
e -> jN || [aN|oN] _ ,, 
o -> wN || aN _ ,, 
{ui} -> [uN jN] || StartOfWord m _ (t [o|a] (s)) EndOfWord ; 

define NasalVowelRule 
VowelAsNasal [[m|n]:0] -> || _ Consonant | x | EndOfWord ; 

define DoubleConsonantAsSingle 
b b:0 | d d:0 | f f:0 | g g:0 | k k:0 | l l:0 | m m:0 | n n:0 | p p:0 | t t:0 | v v:0 | z z:0 ; 

define DoubleConsonantRule 
DoubleConsonantAsSingle @-> ; 

define Onset 0|Consonant | [FirstConsonantInCluster [l|r]] | [[g|k] w] | x ; 

define DiphthongRule 
[[a|a1] i [u:w]] | [NotIVowel [i:j]] | [NotUVowel [u:w]] @-> || _ EndOfWord | s | [(Onset - J) Vowel] ,, 
a [o:w] (s) @-> || StartOfWord _ EndOfWord ; 

define StressVowel a:a1|aN:aN1|e:"e1?"|eN:eN1|i:i1|iN:iN1|o:"o1?"|oN:oN1|u:u1|uN:uN1 ; 
define UnstressVowel a1:a | aN1:aN | [e1|"e1?"]:e | E1:E | eN1:eN | i1:i | iN1:iN | [o1|"o1?"]:o | O1:O | oN1:oN | u1:u | uN1:uN ; 

define StressParoxytone StressVowel -> || _ [\Vowel]* Vowel [\Vowel]* PAR ; 

define StressOxytone StressVowel -> || .#. [\StressedVowel]* _ [\Vowel]* .#. ; 

define UnstressFunctionWord 
UnstressVowel -> || StartOfWord [\Vowel]* _ [\Vowel]* FUNC ; 

define StressedCloseMidVowelRule 
"e1?" : e1 | "o1?" : o1 -> || 
 _ ?* CLOSE , 
 _ Nasal|w ,, 
"e1?" -> e1 || _ e|eN ,, 
"o1?" -> o1 || _ o|oN ; 

define DefaultStressedMidVowelRule 
"e1?" -> E1 , "o1?" -> O1 ; 

define RisingDiphthongContext [a|e|o] (s) EndOfWord ; 

define RisingDiphthongRule 
i -> j || \[t|d] _ RisingDiphthongContext ,, 
u -> w || _ RisingDiphthongContext ; 

define VowelRaisingRule 
e -> i , o -> u || _ (s) EndOfWord ; 

define LVocalizationRule 
l -> w || NotUVowel _ [\Vowel] | EndOfWord ; 

define PalatalizationRule 
d -> dZ , t -> tS || _ i|i1|iN|iN1 ; 

define SVoicingRule 
s -> z || _ VoicedConsonant ; 

define ZDevoicingRule 
z -> s || _ EndOfWord ; 

define XRule 
x -> {ks} ; 

define NTildeRule ñ -> Js ; 

define AposRule %' -> 0 ; 

define ApplyLowerMidTag3 [e:E|o:O] -> || _ [Consonant* Vowel]^2 Consonant* Tag* LM3 Tag* .#. ; 
define ApplyLowerMidTag4 [e:E|o:O] -> || _ [Consonant* Vowel]^3 Consonant* Tag* LM4 Tag* .#. ; 
define ApplyLowerMidTag5 [e:E|o:O] -> || _ [Consonant* Vowel]^4 Consonant* Tag* LM5 Tag* .#. ; 

define Rules 
Word .o. 
AposRule .o. 
TagFunctionWord .o. 
TagCloseWord .o. 
GuQuExceptionsRule .o. 
SHRule .o. 
YAsIRule .o.
TagUnaccentedParoxytone .o. 
AddLowerMidTag3 .o. 
AddLowerMidTag2 .o. 
AddLowerMidTag1 .o. 
IntervocalicSRule .o. 
TransRule .o. 
InitialEXVowelRule .o. 
XBeforeConsonantRule .o. 
XAfterDiphthongRule .o. 
XBeforeVowelExceptionRule .o. 
XBeforeVowelRule .o. 
RestoreXRule .o. 
CRule .o. 
GRule .o. 
UAsWRule .o. 
QRule .o. 
DefaultRRule .o. 
RAsTapRule .o. 
DoubleRRule .o. 
JRule .o. 
YRule .o. 
HRule .o. 
NTildeRule .o. 
VowelWithDiacriticRule .o. 
NasalDiphthongRule1 .o. 
NasalDiphthongRule2 .o. 
DoubleConsonantRule .o. 
NasalVowelRule .o. 
DiphthongRule .o. 
StressParoxytone .o. 
StressOxytone .o. 
UnstressFunctionWord .o. 
StressedCloseMidVowelRule .o. 
DefaultStressedMidVowelRule .o. 
LVocalizationRule .o. 
RisingDiphthongRule .o. 
VowelRaisingRule .o. 
PalatalizationRule .o. 
DoubleSRule .o. 
SVoicingRule .o. 
ZDevoicingRule .o. 
XRule .o. 
ApplyLowerMidTag3 .o. 
ApplyLowerMidTag4 .o. 
ApplyLowerMidTag5 .o. 
RemoveTags ; 

define Mapping 
aN:an | aN1:an1 | 
E:ee | E1:ee1 | eN:en | eN1:en1 | 
iN:in | iN1:in1 | 
O:oo | O1:oo1 | oN:on | oN1:on1 | 
uN:un | uN1:un1 | 
jN:jn | wN:wn | 
R:rh | 
L:lj | J:nj | [Js:[n i]] | 
S:sh | Z:zh | 
tS:tj | dZ:dj ; 

define Rename Mapping -> ; 

define Exceptions 
[{setecentos}:[s E tS i s eN1 t u s]] | 
[{dosvox} : [d O z v O1 k s ]] | 
[{etc.} : [e t s E1 t e r a]] | 
[[{wi} (%-) {fi}] : [u a j f a1 j]] ; 

regex 
[Exceptions .P. Rules] .o. Rename ; 
